Maine, session 132, LD2064.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §24052, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 450, §11, is amended by
amending the section headnote to read:
§24052. Duties; early childhood nutrition grant program administration
Sec. 2. 5 MRSA §24052, sub-§2 is enacted to read:
2. Early childhood nutrition grant program. The council shall create and
administer, with input from the Department of Health and Human Services, Office of Child
and Family Services and the Department of Education, a grant program to allow school
administrative units to enter into agreements with providers of public preschool programs
to provide students in those programs with breakfast, lunch and a snack.
A. The council shall develop eligibility standards and requirements for participation
in the grant program, including, but not limited to:
(1) The public preschool program is not located on the site of a public school, as
defined in Title 20-A, section 1, subsection 24;
(2) The public preschool program meets the Department of Education's basic
approval standards for public preschool under the Department of Education's rule
Chapter 124: Basic Approval Standards: Public Preschool Programs; and
(3) The public preschool program shall provide food that meets the nutrition
standards developed for child care centers pursuant to 42 United States Code,
Section 1766 and administered by the Department of Education, child and adult
care food program.
B. Grants may be awarded by the council as follows.
(1) The amount of the grant is limited to $1,200 per student annually.
(2) In addition to the grant under subparagraph (1), an eligible public preschool
program may apply for an additional grant of no more than $10,000 for
infrastructure improvements to allow the public preschool program to provide
breakfast, lunch and a snack.